Oklahoma, session 2025, SB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1120.3 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. In addition to taxes and fees imposed by the Corporation


Commission pursuant to the provisions of Section 1120 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, the Commission shall impose a fee of One


Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on all vehicles registered under the


International Registration Plan that report mileage in this state.


B. 1. Five percent (5%) of all monies collected through the


fee imposed in subsection A of this section shall be deposited in

Req. No. 255 Page 1


the Uninsured Commercial Vehicle Recovery Reimbursement Fund created


in Section 2 of this act.


2. Ninety-five percent (95%) of all monies collected through


the fee imposed in subsection A of this section shall be deposited


in the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund created in


Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1120.4 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Corporation Commission to be designated the “Uninsured


Commercial Vehicle Recovery Reimbursement Fund”. The fund shall be


a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies directed to be deposited in the fund pursuant


to Section 1 of this act for the purpose of reimbursing wrecker and


tower operators who provide nonconsensual tow services to uninsured


commercial vehicles. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund


are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Commission for the purpose provided in this section. Expenditures


from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the



Req. No. 255 Page 2


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-255 MSBB 12/30/2024 12:43:27 PM































Req. No. 255 Page 3